Washington statutes.
RCW 43.09.020

Auditor of public accounts.

The auditor shall be auditor of public accounts, and shall have such powers and perform such duties in connection therewith as may be prescribed by law.

[ 1989 c 140 s 1; 1965 c 8 s 43.09.020. Prior: 1890 p 635 s 2; RRS s 10997; prior: Code 1881 s 2567; 1871 p 97 s 4; 1854 p 409 s 3.]

NOTES:

Budget and accounting system, powers and duties: RCW 43.88.160.

Fiscal records open to public: RCW 43.88.200.